ext-firefox-thunderbird-seamonkey/british-english-dictionary-darmeth/dictionaries/en-GB.aff
SFX d Y 16
SFX d 0 d e
SFX d 0 ked [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX d 0 led [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX d y ied [^aeiou]y
SFX d 0 ed [aeiou]y
SFX d 0 ed [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX d 0 ed [^aeiou][cl]
SFX d 0 ed [^ecly]
SFX d e ing [^eioy]e
SFX d 0 ing [eoy]e
SFX d ie ying ie
SFX d 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX d 0 ling [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX d 0 ing [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX d 0 ing [^aeiou][cl]
SFX d 0 ing [^ecl]
SFX h Y 22
SFX h 0 dly e
SFX h 0 bedly [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX h 0 kedly [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX h 0 dedly [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX h 0 fedly [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX h 0 gedly [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX h 0 kedly [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX h 0 ledly [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX h 0 medly [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX h 0 nedly [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX h 0 pedly [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX h 0 redly [^aeio][aiou]r
SFX h 0 sedly [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX h 0 tedly [^aeio][aiou]t
SFX h 0 vedly [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX h 0 zedly [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX h 0 edly [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX h y iedly [^aeiou]y
SFX h 0 edly [aeiou]y
SFX h 0 edly [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX h 0 edly [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX h 0 edly [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX i Y 22
SFX i 0 dness e
SFX i 0 bedness [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX i 0 kedness [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX i 0 dedness [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX i 0 fedness [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX i 0 gedness [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX i 0 kedness [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX i 0 ledness [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX i 0 medness [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX i 0 nedness [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX i 0 pedness [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX i 0 redness [^aeio][aiou]r
SFX i 0 sedness [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX i 0 tedness [^aeio][aiou]t
SFX i 0 vedness [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX i 0 zedness [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX i 0 edness [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX i y iedness [^aeiou]y
SFX i 0 edness [aeiou]y
SFX i 0 edness [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX i 0 edness [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX i 0 edness [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX T Y 42
SFX T 0 r e
SFX T 0 st e
SFX T 0 ber [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX T 0 best [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX T 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX T 0 kest [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX T 0 der [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX T 0 dest [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX T 0 fer [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX T 0 fest [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX T 0 ger [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX T 0 gest [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX T 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX T 0 kest [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX T 0 ler [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX T 0 lest [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX T 0 mer [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX T 0 mest [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX T 0 ner [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX T 0 nest [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX T 0 per [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX T 0 pest [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX T 0 rer [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX T 0 rest [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX T 0 ser [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX T 0 sest [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX T 0 ter [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX T 0 test [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX T 0 ver [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX T 0 vest [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX T 0 zer [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX T 0 zest [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX T y ier [^aeiou]y
SFX T y iest [^aeiou]y
SFX T 0 er [aeiou]y
SFX T 0 est [aeiou]y
SFX T 0 er [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 er [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 er [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX T 0 est [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 est [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 est [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX R Y 72
SFX R 0 r e
SFX R 0 rs e
SFX R 0 ber [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX R 0 bers [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX R 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX R 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX R 0 der [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX R 0 ders [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX R 0 fer [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX R 0 fers [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX R 0 ger [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX R 0 gers [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX R 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX R 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX R 0 ler [^aeio][eiou]l
SFX R 0 er [aeio][eiou]l
SFX R 0 ler [^aeo]al
SFX R 0 er [aeo]al
SFX R 0 lers [^aeio][eiou]l
SFX R 0 ers [aeio][eiou]l
SFX R 0 lers [^aeo]al
SFX R 0 ers [aeo]al
SFX R 0 mer [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX R 0 mers [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX R 0 ner [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX R 0 ners [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX R 0 per [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX R 0 pers [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX R 0 rer [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX R 0 rers [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX R 0 ser [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX R 0 sers [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX R 0 ter [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX R 0 ters [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX R 0 ver [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX R 0 vers [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX R 0 zer [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX R 0 zers [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX R y ier [^aeiou]y
SFX R y iers [^aeiou]y
SFX R 0 er [aeiou]y
SFX R 0 ers [aeiou]y
SFX R 0 er [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz]
SFX R 0 ers [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz]
SFX R 0 er [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX R 0 ers [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX R 0 er [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX R 0 ers [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX R 0 r's e
SFX R 0 ber's [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX R 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX R 0 der's [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX R 0 fer's [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX R 0 ger's [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX R 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX R 0 ler's [^aeio][eiou]l
SFX R 0 er's [aeio][eiou]l
SFX R 0 ler's [^aeo]al
SFX R 0 er's [aeo]al
SFX R 0 mer's [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX R 0 ner's [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX R 0 per's [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX R 0 rer's [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX R 0 ser's [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX R 0 ter's [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX R 0 ver's [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX R 0 zer's [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX R y ier's [^aeiou]y
SFX R 0 er's [aeiou]y
SFX R 0 er's [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz]
SFX R 0 er's [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX R 0 er's [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX r Y 24
SFX r 0 r e
SFX r 0 ler [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX r 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX r y ier [^aeiou]y
SFX r 0 er [aeiou]y
SFX r 0 er [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX r 0 er [^aeiou][cl]
SFX r 0 er [^ecly]
SFX r 0 rs e
SFX r 0 lers [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX r 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX r y iers [^aeiou]y
SFX r 0 ers [aeiou]y
SFX r 0 ers [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX r 0 ers [^aeiou][cl]
SFX r 0 ers [^ecly]
SFX r 0 r's e
SFX r 0 ler's [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX r 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX r y ier's [^aeiou]y
SFX r 0 er's [aeiou]y
SFX r 0 er's [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX r 0 er's [^aeiou][cl]
SFX r 0 er's [^ecly]
SFX S Y 9
SFX S y ies [^aeiou]y
SFX S 0 s [aeiou]y
SFX S 0 es [sxz]
SFX S 0 es [cs]h
SFX S 0 s [^cs]h
SFX S 0 s [ae]u
SFX S 0 x [ae]u
SFX S 0 s [^ae]u
SFX S 0 s [^hsuxyz]
SFX P Y 6
SFX P y iness [^aeiou]y
SFX P 0 ness [aeiou]y
SFX P 0 ness [^y]
SFX P y inesses [^aeiou]y
SFX P 0 nesses [aeiou]y
SFX P 0 nesses [^y]
SFX m Y 20
SFX m 0 sman [bdknmt]
SFX m 0 sman [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 man [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 man [^bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 man [^bdeknmt]
SFX m 0 smen [bdknmt]
SFX m 0 smen [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 men [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 men [^bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 men [^bdeknmt]
SFX m 0 sman's [bdknmt]
SFX m 0 sman's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 man's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 man's [^bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 man's [^bdeknmt]
SFX m 0 smen's [bdknmt]
SFX m 0 smen's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 men's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 men's [^bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 men's [^bdeknmt]
SFX 5 Y 20
SFX 5 0 swoman [bdknmt]
SFX 5 0 swoman [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 woman [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 woman [^bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 woman [^bdeknmt]
SFX 5 0 swomen [bdknmt]
SFX 5 0 swomen [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 women [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 women [^bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 women [^bdeknmt]
SFX 5 0 swoman's [bdknmt]
SFX 5 0 swoman's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 woman's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 woman's [^bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 woman's [^bdeknmt]
SFX 5 0 women's [^bdeknmt]
SFX 5 0 swomen's [bdknmt]
SFX 5 0 swomen's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 women's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 women's [^bdklmnt]e
SFX 6 Y 3
SFX 6 y iful [^aeiou]y
SFX 6 0 ful [aeiou]y
SFX 6 0 ful [^y]
SFX j Y 3
SFX j y ifully [^aeiou]y
SFX j 0 fully [aeiou]y
SFX j 0 fully [^y]
SFX p Y 5
SFX p y iless [^aeiou]y
SFX p 0 less [aeiou]y
SFX p 0 ess ll
SFX p 0 less [^l]l
SFX p 0 less [^ly]
