ext-firefox-thunderbird-seamonkey/british-english-dictionary-darmeth/dictionaries/en-GB.dic
advertorial/SM
advise/hl
agitate/NGhSDX
amaze/GkDSh
amidship/S
anchor/SdMp
arch/GyRMYDS
attend/GSD
axe/mMDSG
backhand/SDMh
bak/rd
bale/MGj6DS
ballot/MdS
bane/j6Oo
bash/G6jDS
basket/My6S
bat/MdZDR25mSG
beard/pZSGMDi
beat/RSJMG7
beefy/T
being/SM
Berlin/rM
betoken/dS
bewilder/kdSih
blame/6DSjlGp
blaze/kGMRDS
bless/ihJGSD
blood/hMDp2zGZS
blowsy/T
blunder/kSJdr
blush/RG6kMSD
bluster/dSZk
bogey/SmMDG
bone/pMSZ2
Boswell/MS
bound/RDpGS
bounty/SMj6
box/R6GZMDS
brassy/T
breath/ZS7MDpG
Brexit/Mr
buffer/d
bunk/GRSD
bursty/T
bush/mGJMDSZ2
business/m5M
busy/TGYDSP
camera/5SOmM
campaign/GRMDS
carbon/qSpQNWM
car/MdrZS
cart/SGMD6R
cater/rSd
change/6jSDpBGMl
charge/RGMSD
chasten/dS
chatty/T
checkmate/SDG
cheer/DMp2Gz6ZSj
chess/mM
church/mGpMDSYZ
clammy/T
class/Z2wpSDM1G
clergy/5mS
cloister/SdM
coal/mGSD
cobble/GMRSD
cod/rDdMSG
colloquium/S
colour/j3SQqlBNDMJp6G
common/rY
concede/h
conceit/DShi
concern/GhSD
confirm/Nyni7h
confuse/kiGh
congress/m5GMSDx
connect/SD7ibvhVG
constrain/h
content/EShDG
control/BRSMGl
cor/dS
cost/MYOSpGVJvu
counterparty/S
cov/r
coy/TY
crab/ZMiGzD2Sh
craft/m5ZSMDGz2
crest/SGMDp
cricket/MrS
crook/hDMiGS
croon/RGDS
crude/MYT
cub/d31SMZWw
curs/DSiyGh
cuss/hDSGi
dairy/mSMG
dark/STYM
daughter/SpMY
decametre/MS
deceit/Sj6
dedicate/XyNGVhDS
deed/SGMDp
delight/6hj
deliver/g7rd
delivery/mS
deprave/iNSDGhX
deserve/ikh
detach/LGhBSDli
devote/xh
dial/MRDSG
din/GRMdrDS
dire/YTj6
discomfit/d
disconnect/i
disdain/GSDj6
disguise/h
disinterest/i
disorder/hY
dissipate/SDXihVNG
distress/Djk6G
div/drZ
djellaba/S
doubt/S6GkMjpD7
downshift/RDMSG
draught/mSZz5M2
dray/mS
dream/pSZ6RGz2kMD
dreamy/T
Dutch/5mM
duty/SMj76
early/T
elate/iSDhGN
Elye/MS
embed/SGiD
embezzle/RGDS
embolden/dS
enforce/GLDRSBh
English/5mM
event/6MDjGSp
exalt/DXGNhS
excite/nSDBlhkNG
exit/MdS
expos/dS
extend/v7uxGXNVShDib
eyeline/RM
faith/6MSjp
fate/6SjM
feature/MGpSD
fester/dS
few/T
fit/TDMYJGRSj6
fix/7JDRSVihG
flam/rdkB
flavour/6GJjMDpS
fleshy/T
flop/2zGSMZD
flounder/Sd
food/MpS
force/pGM6hSDjb
fore/5mS
forehand/DMSi
foresight/hDi
forge/RSDGy
forget/j6GS
frail/YT
French/m5M
fret/j6DGS
fright/SjG6D
frontiers/m5
fruit/S6jMdpN
funny/T
gain/SGD6Mj
gastronome/wS1Z
gentle/mTDG
ghostwrite/RGS
gift/MDhGiS
giggly/T
gland/MpS
glass/pSDMZ2zG6
glimmer/dS
grace/EGjDS6
greasy/YT
groom/MRDGS
grounds/m
grumpy/T
guard/iGMDhS
guile/jp6
guilt/Zp2z
guts/RZ
happen/dJS
hate/6jSM
hat/rdDRpGMS
hazy/YT
heart/zhp2SZMDi
heed/SDpjG6
help/RG6JSpMDj
herbal/3S
high/STPMY
highway/SmM
hon/Sd
hope/6pSjM
hothead/DMSih
hot/SGTDYZ
hug/MRDGS
hurry/SDGhi
ill/PTvVN
impact/6GD
impedance/SM
insight/6j
interconnect/DGSi
interpret/nrd7SNVvg
interrelate/XDSGNi
interview/GRSDM
Irish/m5M
jabber/dS
jade/hMGDSi
jag/hGiSDZ
jammy/TS
jelly/SDMG
jest/kSDG6
jury/5SM
Kar/YZmM
kind/PYTS
knobby/T
ladder/d
las/r
latecomer/S
law/jM6pS
lead/GRpZSMDJ
lens/mS
lev/MrS
limber/dSY
lines/m
lip/DpSMZ
little/TM
log/MwWGRSD1
London/rM
lung/G6DMS
magic/GDMS
man/MWYj6DS1G
market/g7MdS
marshy/T
mercy/pSM6j
mesquite/S
met/wdr
micromanage/DRSG
middle/mSDMG
mind/SjpMDG6i
mirth/6pj
misguide/h
monitor/dSZM
mossy/ST
mount/SCGED
mouth/6zG2SZMD
mov/drkl7
mug/JGSRMZ2D6
need/ZS2MDpG6
not/xnSl7MdN
obsessive/S
pace/mMGDSZ
pain/DMjG6Sp
paltry/T
pap/MOrZS
parrot/dMS
partner/SdM
patrol/5SGMD
peace/Mlj6S
peddle/RGSD
peer/pGD
picket/rdMS
pinstripe/MSD
pip/rSGdMD
plan/RDdGMS
plants/5m
plaster/SrMd
pleasure/DS6MGlp
plough/mGMDS
point/RGhDpMSZ
poison/rSdM
pouty/T
power/jpd6
pow/R
prayer/j6
prepare/nhVNyi
prick/MDYSG
profit/Mdl7gpS
propos/dS
punt/GRDS
purport/hGDS
railing/MS
railway/MSm
rang/GzR2DZ
ratchet/dSM
reckon/Srd
reject/SRMDG
remorse/j6p
render/dSJ
report/7h
reproach/7SD6Gj
rest/ujGV6vpDS
re/xJnoNi
rid/rDSG
right/jGYDM6ZS
ripe/T
roof/GDMSp
roommate/SM
round/SGRTYDMi
rue/jS6
rug/iDMSh
sad/3PTY
sale/m5SM
sat/d
Scot/MZ5mS
scribble/GJDRS
scrubby/T
sectarian/S
seed/mpGzZSJMD2
sense/Mp
sham/DdMZGS
sharpen/rdS
shop/RDMSG
Shori/M6
sickly/T
sick/PSYM
simper/dkS
sin/jGR6DMpS
sketch/MSDzG2Z
slap/GRSMD
slither/SZd
sloth/SMj6
smudgy/T
snip/rGSdD
son/pMSWZY1
sophisticate/GDSh
spam/GRSDMZ
spar/dDkSG
spindly/T
spite/Cj6
spit/SMdGD
stag/drMS
star/dZMDpSG
states/m5
sticky/TS
strange/TRY
substructure/MS
sugar/dZSM
super/m
sup/rDRSG
suspense/6M
sweaty/T
synthesis/SrdQ
talent/SMDp
tap/GrMdDS
taste/ES6j
tear/G6pSMj
techy/S
thank/Sp6GjD
thatch/MDRSG
thick/TYP
tighten/dS
tire/GiDSph
toe/pDSMG
torment/DGhkS
trade/7m5SM
traditionalise/SD
trad/r7d
tribe/S5M
true/TGDS
tub/S6dMZO
tune/Jpj6M7S
tun/SGrdD7WZ
us/drSg7
vacillator/SM
valve/pMS
visit/AdS
vlog/GRDSM
wag/SrDdGM
wail/MDjG6S
waste/jR6GSDM
weak/TYP
weather/QSMdm
weed/GpMDZS
weedkiller/SM
wee/dTSG
wick/iDMGhS
wilder/P
wit/PMZpDS2Gz
woe/jS6
wormy/T
worry/RkSDMGh
worship/RGSD6j
wreck/SG6RMD
wretch/MDSih
writ/rSM7
yodel/RDGS
zest/RMZ6j
